test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-iiqedw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - īʼedõ: # Verb 57 'eng /est lõigata/fin' - full paradigm
     īʼedõ+V+Inf: īʼedõ
     īʼedõ+V+Ger: īʼedõs
     īʼedõ+V+Sup: īʼedõm
     īʼedõ+V+Sup+Ine: īʼedõmõs
     īʼedõ+V+Sup+Ela: īʼedõmõst
     īʼedõ+V+Sup+Tra: īʼedõmõks
     īʼedõ+V+Sup+Abe: īʼedõmõt
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: īʼedõb
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: īʼedõt
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: īʼedõbõd
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: īʼediz
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [īʼedizt, īʼediztõ]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [īʼedizt, īʼediztõ]
     īʼedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: īʼed
     īʼedõ+V+Cond+Sg3: īʼedõks
     īʼedõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: īʼed
     īʼedõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: īʼed
     īʼedõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: īʼedõgid
     īʼedõ+V+Jus+Sg3: īʼedõg
     īʼedõ+V+Quo+Sg3: īʼediji
     īʼedõ+V+ActPrfPrc: īʼedõn
     īʼedõ+V+PssPrfPrc: īʼedtõd
